Washington statutes.
RCW 26.55.900

Uniformity of application and construction—2019 c 263.

In applying and construing this uniform act, consideration must be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter among states that enact it.

[ 2019 c 263 s 908.]